Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB344.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 82 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "City" includes:
1. A city of any class; and
2. A merged government that adopts the responsibilities and duties of the
city or cities it incorporates, including:
a. A charter county government;
b. A unified local government;
c. An urban-county government; and
d. A consolidated local government;
(b) "Project workforce agreement" means a collective bargaining agreement
that applies to a specific public construction project, lasts only for the
duration of the project, and guarantees the project will use contractors
registered with an apprenticeship and training program; and
(c) "Public construction project" means any project performed within the city's
boundaries that:
1. Is solicited and funded by a local public agency or the Commonwealth
of Kentucky;
2. Is for the purpose of making public improvements or building new, or
performing maintenance on existing, publicly owned buildings; and
3. Has an aggregate cost of over one million dollars ($1,000,000).
(2) The applicable legislative body of a city may enact an ordinance establishing a
mandatory preference for awarding a bid for a public construction project
contract to a contractor or group of contractors registered with an apprenticeship
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 100
and training program, which shall be incorporated into a project workforce
agreement.
(3) Notwithstanding KRS Chapter 337, the applicable legislative body of a city may
negotiate all terms of a project workforce agreement, including any provision
related to the payment of wages that are greater than the existing state or federal
minimum wage.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 337 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "City" includes:
1. A city of any class; and
2. A merged government that adopts the responsibilities and duties of the
city or cities it incorporates, including:
a. A charter county government;
b. A unified local government;
c. An urban-county government; and
d. A consolidated local government;
(b) "Prevailing wage" means the hourly rate of wages and benefits paid to
employees employed on a public works project;
(c) "Prevailing wage rate" means the average hourly rate of wages and
benefits paid to an employee employed within the same city in the same
trade or occupation and performing substantially similar job duties; and
(d) "Public works project" means any project that involves a contract for public
works, as defined in KRS 45A.487, that is solicited and funded by a local
public agency or the Commonwealth of Kentucky and performed within the
city's boundaries, excluding any project subject to the Davis-Bacon Act, as
amended, 40 U.S.C. sec. 3141 et seq.
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 100
(2) The applicable legislative body of a city may enact ordinances establishing a
prevailing wage rate and requiring an employer to pay an employee a prevailing
wage when he or she is employed on a public works project that is estimated to
cost at least one million dollars ($1,000,000).
(3) If the applicable legislative body of a city enacts prevailing wage ordinances, it
shall establish within the body of the ordinances at a minimum:
(a) Classifications of each applicable trade or occupation and descriptions of
various positions that occupy each class;
(b) The prevailing wage rate for each classification of trade or occupation;
(c) An annual prevailing wage rate schedule;
(d) A process for record keeping;
(e) A process for compliance investigations; and
(f) Penalties.
Section 3. KRS 65.016 is amended to read as follows:
The legislative body of any city, county, consolidated local government, urban-county
government, charter county government, or unified local government may adopt and
enforce:
(1) Minimum wage ordinances that set rates in excess of state and federal minimum
wage rates; and
(2) Ordinances requiring employers, as defined in KRS 337.010, to provide leave to
their employees[ shall not have the authority to require any employer to pay to an
employee a certain wage or fringe benefit other than as determined by the
employer].
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:30 PM Jacketed